Hawaii statutes.
§342J-13 Fees. The director may
establish reasonable fees for the issuance of permits to cover the cost of
issuance thereof and for the implementation and enforcement of the terms and
conditions of permits (not including court costs or other costs associated with
any formal enforcement action). The fees shall be deposited to the credit of
the general fund. [L 1989, c 212, pt of §5; am L 1990, c 298, §12]

Note

The amendment made by L 2014, c 218, §8 is not included in
this section.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next